Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 3

Licensing, Certification and Examination

62-39-301. Application for license, certification or examination — Fingerprinting and criminal history information.

Applications for an initial registration, license or certification, a renewal license or certification and examinations shall be made in writing to the commission on forms approved by the commission.

Appropriate fees, as fixed by the commission pursuant to § 62-39-205, must accompany all applications for an:

Initial or renewal registration, license, or certification; and

Examination.

At the time of filing an application for registration, license or certification, an applicant shall sign a pledge to comply with the standards set forth in this chapter. The pledge shall also state that the applicant understands the types of misconduct for which disciplinary proceedings may be initiated against a registered trainee, licensed real estate appraiser or certified real estate appraiser, as set forth in this chapter.

The commission shall require each applicant applying on or after January 1, 2015, for initial registration, licensure, or certification under this chapter to submit a full set of the applicant’s fingerprints in order for the commission to obtain and receive national criminal history records from the FBI criminal justice information services division. Unless the commission contracts, or makes use of an existing contract pursuant to subdivision (d)(2), the commission shall submit the applicant’s fingerprints and the fee required to perform the criminal history record checks to the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation for state and national criminal history record checks. The commission may require any fingerprints submitted pursuant to this subsection (d) be provided in an electronic format.

The commission may contract, or make use of any existing contract with this state, for the collection and transmission of fingerprints authorized under this section. If the commission contracts, or makes use of an existing contract, the commission may order the applicant to pay the fee for collecting and transmitting fingerprints to the contractor. The commission may agree to a reasonable fingerprinting fee to be charged by the contractor to the applicant.

The commission shall treat and maintain an applicant’s fingerprints and any criminal history record information obtained under this section as confidential and limit the use of records solely to the purposes authorized in this section. The fingerprints and any criminal history record information shall not be subject to subpoena, other than one issued in a criminal action or investigation, and shall be confidential by law and privileged, and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action.

The commission shall refuse to issue an initial registration, license, or certification to an applicant who does not provide fingerprints in compliance with this subsection (d).

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 10; 2014, ch. 621, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 621, § 3 provided that the Tennessee real estate appraiser commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.

62-39-302. Authorization to appraise certain types of real estate — Licensed appraiser — Certified residential appraiser — Certified general appraiser.

A state licensed appraiser may perform appraisals of the following properties:

All properties with a transaction value of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000);

Noncomplex residential properties with a transaction value up to, but not including, one million dollars ($1,000,000); and

Agricultural properties, including agricultural properties with up to two (2) dwelling units, with a value up to, but not including, one million dollars ($1,000,000).

A state certified residential appraiser shall be authorized to appraise all properties that a state licensed appraiser may appraise and also all residential real property consisting of one (1) to four (4) units.

A state certified general appraiser shall have no transaction value limits on the appraiser's appraisal practice.

Nothing contained within the language of this section shall be construed to authorize a state licensed appraiser to appraise property that federal agencies require to be appraised by a state certified appraiser.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 11; 1991, ch. 366, § 12; 1992, ch. 702, § 3.

62-39-303. License — Appraiser — Qualifications.

To qualify for a real estate appraiser license, an applicant must:

Have a high school diploma or its equivalent; and

Have met the current requirements for licensure as set forth by the appraisal qualifications board of the appraisal foundation.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 12; 1991, ch. 108, § 1; 1991, ch. 366, §§ 13, 14; 1994, ch. 605, § 1.

62-39-304. Real estate appraiser trainee — Rules.

As a prerequisite to making application for licensure as a state-licensed real estate appraiser, a state-certified residential real estate appraiser or a state-certified general appraiser, an applicant must register as a real estate appraiser trainee, in addition to all other lawful requirements, then demonstrate two (2) years of service under a state-certified residential real estate appraiser or a state-certified general real estate appraiser as a real estate appraiser trainee or equivalent experience as determined by the commission and in compliance with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice promulgated by the appraisal standards board of the appraisal foundation.

Eligibility for registration as a real estate appraiser trainee shall be determined by the Tennessee real estate appraisal commission.

An application for registration as a real estate appraiser trainee shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee.

A certificate of registration as a real estate appraiser trainee will expire two (2) years following the date of issuance, unless renewed prior to expiration.

This section shall not apply to persons serving as a trainee under the supervision of a state-certified residential real estate appraiser or a state-certified general real estate appraiser as of June 30, 1997.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 13; 1991, ch. 366, § 16; 1997, ch. 370, § 1.

62-39-305. License — Appraiser — Expiration.

If the commission determines that an applicant meets the requirements of this chapter and is qualified for a real estate appraiser license, it shall issue a license to the applicant that shall expire two (2) years following the date of issuance unless revoked or suspended prior to expiration. The expiration date of the license shall appear on the license and no other notice of its expiration need be given to its holder.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 14.

62-39-306. License — Renewal — Regulations.

The commission shall promulgate regulations to ensure that each individual renewing the individual's license as a real estate appraiser under this chapter has a working knowledge of current real estate appraisal theories, practices and techniques that will enable the individual to provide competent real estate appraisal services to the members of the public with whom the individual deals in a professional relationship under the authority of the individual's real estate appraiser license.

No amendment or repeal of a regulation adopted by the commission pursuant to this section shall operate to deprive a licensed real estate appraiser of credit toward renewal of the appraiser's license for any course of instruction that is successfully completed by the applicant prior to the date of the amendment or repeal of the regulation.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 15; 1991, ch. 366, § 17.

62-39-307. Current, valid license — Application for renewal — Refusal to renew.

To renew a current, valid real estate appraiser license, the holder of the license shall file an application on a form approved by the commission and pay the prescribed renewal fee to the commission no earlier than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the expiration date of the license then held. Each application for renewal shall be accompanied by evidence in the form prescribed by the commission of having completed the continuing education requirement for renewal specified in this chapter.

The commission may refuse to renew any license if the licensee has continued to perform real estate appraisal activities in this state following the expiration of the license.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 16; 1991, ch. 366, § 18; 2014, ch. 570, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The language “other than a temporary license issued under § 62-39-322,” following “appraiser license” in the first sentence of (a) was deleted by the code commission in 1991. Acts 1991, ch. 366, § 34 deleted the former provisions in § 62-39-322 concerning temporary licenses that were referred to in (a).

62-39-308. Commission — Power to discipline and penalize.

The commission has the power to discipline and penalize a license or certificate holder for violations of this chapter or the rules and regulations of the commission.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 17; 1991, ch. 366, § 19.

62-39-309. [Reserved.]

There shall be at least two (2) classes of certification for state certified real estate appraisers. These classes shall include:

The state certified residential real estate appraiser classification shall consist of those persons meeting the requirements for certification relating to the appraisal of residential real property; and

The state certified general real estate appraiser classification shall consist of those persons meeting the requirements for certification relating to the appraisal of all types of real property.

The application for original certification, renewal certification and examination shall specify the classification of certification being applied for or previously granted.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 19; 1991, ch. 366, § 21.

62-39-311. Certification examination.

It is the intent of this chapter that any certification examination be consistent with and equivalent to the uniform state certification examination issued or endorsed by the appraisal qualifications board of the appraisal foundation, and the commission may adopt changes in the examination to meet these criteria. An original certification as a state certified real estate appraiser shall not be issued to any person who has not demonstrated through a written examination process that the person possesses the following:

Appropriate knowledge of technical terms commonly used in or related to real estate appraising, appraisal report writing and economic concepts applicable to real estate;

Understanding of the principles of land economics, real estate appraisal processes and of problems likely to be encountered in gathering, interpreting and processing of data in carrying out appraisal disciplines;

Understanding of the standards for the development and communication of real estate appraisals as provided in this chapter;

Knowledge of theories of depreciation, cost estimating, methods of capitalization and the mathematics of real estate appraisal that are appropriate for the classification of certificate applied for;

Knowledge of other principles and procedures as may be appropriate for the respective classifications;

Basic understanding of real estate law; and

Understanding of the types of misconduct for which disciplinary proceedings may be initiated against a state certified real estate appraiser.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 20.

62-39-312. Prerequisites to taking certification examination.

As a prerequisite to taking the examination for certification as a state-certified general real estate appraiser, applicants shall submit satisfactory evidence that they have met the current requirements for certification as a certified general real estate appraiser as set forth by the appraisal qualifications board of the appraisal foundation.

As a prerequisite to taking the examination for certification as a state-certified residential real estate appraiser, an applicant shall present satisfactory evidence to the commission that the applicant has completed the current requirements for certification as set forth by the appraisal qualifications board of the appraisal foundation.

It is the intent of this chapter to meet the minimum criteria for certification established from time to time by the appraisal qualifications board of the appraisal foundation, and the commission may recommend changes to this section to meet those criteria.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 21; 1991, ch. 366, §§ 22-24; 1994, ch. 605, §§ 2, 3.

62-39-313. Certification — Experience requirement.

As a prerequisite to certification, a person must have completed the appraisal experience requirement currently set forth by the appraisal qualifications board of the appraisal foundation.

Each applicant for certification shall furnish under oath a detailed listing of the real estate appraisal reports or file memoranda for each year for which experience is claimed by the applicant. Upon request, the applicant shall make available to the commission for examination a sample of appraisal reports that the applicant has prepared in the course of the applicant's appraisal practice.

It is the intent of this chapter to meet the minimum criteria for certification established from time to time by the appraiser qualifications board of the appraisal foundation and the commission may recommend changes to this section to meet those criteria.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 22; 1991, ch. 108, § 2; 1994, ch. 605, § 4.

62-39-314. Certification — Expiration.

The initial certification issued under the authority of this chapter shall expire upon the expiration date of the certificate held by a certificate holder. Thereafter, the term of a certificate issued under the authority of this chapter shall be two (2) years from the date of issuance unless revoked or suspended prior to expiration.

The expiration date of the certificate shall appear on the certificate and no other notice of its expiration need be given to its holder.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 23; 1991, ch. 366, § 25.

62-39-315. Renewal certificate — Requirements.

To obtain a renewal certificate as a state certified real estate appraiser, the holder of a current, valid certificate shall make application and pay the prescribed fee to the commission no earlier than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the expiration date of the certificate then held. With the application for renewal, the state certified real estate appraiser shall present evidence in the form prescribed by the commission of having completed the continuing education requirements for renewal specified in this chapter.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 24; 1991, ch. 366, § 26; 2014, ch. 570, § 2.

62-39-316. Denial of certificate — Grounds.

The commission may deny the issuance of a certificate as a state licensed or certified real estate appraiser to an applicant who has been convicted of a felony or on any of the grounds enumerated in this chapter.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 25; 1991, ch. 366, § 27.

Cross-References. Hearings, § 62-39-328.

62-39-317. Required notice to commission of addresses — Places of business — Residence — Change of address.

Each state licensed or certified real estate appraiser shall advise the commission of the address of the appraiser's principal place of business and all other addresses at which the appraiser is currently engaged in the business of preparing real property appraisal reports.

Whenever a state licensed or certified real estate appraiser changes a place of business, the appraiser shall within thirty (30) days give written notification of the change to the commission.

Every state licensed or certified real estate appraiser shall notify the commission of the appraiser's current residence address.

The commission shall charge a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for processing a change of address request. Failure to promptly notify the commission of the change of address and pay the applicable fee shall be grounds for disciplinary action.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 26; 1991, ch. 366, §§ 28-30; 1994, ch. 605, §§ 6, 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1991, ch. 366, § 29 directed that, in (b), “within thirty (30) days” be substituted for “immediately give written notification of the change to the commission and apply for an amended certificate”; however, “within thirty (30) days” has been substituted for “immediately” in order to implement the perceived legislative intent.

62-39-318. Suit to collect compensation for appraisal services — License or certificate required.

No person engaged in the business of real estate appraising in this state or acting in the capacity of a real estate appraiser in this state may bring or maintain any action in any court of this state to collect compensation for the performance of real estate appraisal services for which a license or certificate is required by this chapter, without alleging and proving that the person was the holder of a valid real estate appraiser license or certificate in this state at all times during the performance of the services.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 27; 1991, ch. 366, § 31.

62-39-319. Penalties.

Any person required by this chapter to be licensed who engages in real estate appraisal activity in this state without obtaining a license for the appraisal activity or who violates this chapter commits a Class A misdemeanor and shall be ineligible to obtain a license for a period of one (1) year from the date of the person's conviction of the offense.

The board shall not deny, revoke, suspend, refuse to renew or discriminate against any applicant for membership or lack of membership in any real estate appraiser organization.

No person, corporation, governmental entity, bank or other financial institution shall discriminate against any appraiser for membership or lack of membership in any appraisal organization. A violation of this subsection (c) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Any attempt by any person, corporation, governmental entity, bank or other financial institution to unduly intimidate an appraiser or influence an appraiser's report relating to market conditions or determination of value is a Class A misdemeanor.

The commission shall use all available means to locate and communicate with all persons holding themselves out as appraisers.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 28; 1991, ch. 366, § 32.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in (a) has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that an offense of designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also § 39-11-114.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-39-320. Roster of licensed appraisers.

The commission shall prepare and issue at least once each calendar year a roster showing the name and place of business of each real estate appraiser currently licensed and each real estate appraiser currently certified. A copy of the roster shall be made available to the public, upon application to the commission, at a reasonable price per copy that may be fixed by the commission.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 29.

62-39-321. Certificate of good standing.

The commission, upon payment of a fee in an amount specified in its regulations, shall issue a letter stating that a license or certificate holder is in good standing in this state.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 30; 1991, ch. 366, § 33.

62-39-322. Nonresident licensees and certificate holders — Reciprocity — Fees.

If, in the determination of the commission, a state is deemed to have meaningful requirements for licensure and certification, then the commission shall grant reciprocal rights to licensees and certificate holders who are in good standing in that state.

The commission shall set reasonable fees for the practice of appraisal in this state by licensees and certificate holders of other states that have been granted reciprocity.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 31; 1991, ch. 366, § 34; 2013, ch. 180, § 14.

62-39-323. License or certificate number to appear on appraisal reports — Authorized use of initials.

A license or certificate issued under authority of this chapter shall bear the license or certificate number assigned by the commission.

Each state licensed real estate appraiser shall place the real estate appraiser's license number adjacent to or immediately below the title “State Licensed Real Estate Appraiser” when used in an appraisal report or in a contract or other instrument used by the license holder in conducting appraisal activities, unless the licensed appraiser is also a state certified appraiser.

Each state certified real estate appraiser shall place the real estate appraiser's certificate number adjacent to or immediately below the title “State Certified Residential Real Estate Appraiser” or “State Certified General Real Estate Appraiser” when used in an appraisal report or in a contract or other instrument used by the certificate holder in conducting appraisal activities.

In lieu of spelling out the full title as set forth in this section, a state-certified general real estate appraiser may use the initials “C.G.,” a state-certified residential real estate appraiser may use the initials “C.R.” and a state licensed real estate appraiser may use the initials “L.I.” The initials should be immediately followed by the license or certificate number. The unauthorized use of these initials by an unlicensed person to imply that the person is a licensed or certified appraiser constitutes a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 32; 1994, ch. 605, § 8; 1995, ch. 222, § 3.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-39-324. Use of certain titles restricted to individual holders of license or certificate — Issuance of license or certificate to certain entities prohibited.

“State certified real estate appraiser,” “state certified residential real estate appraiser,” “state certified general real estate appraiser” or “state licensed real estate appraiser” may only be used to refer to individuals who hold the license or certificate and may not be used following or immediately in connection with the name or signature of a firm, partnership, corporation or group or in such manner that it might be interpreted as referring to a firm, partnership, corporation, group or anyone other than an individual holder of the license or certificate.

No license or certificate shall be issued under this chapter to a firm, partnership, corporation or group. This shall not be construed to prevent a state licensed or certified real estate appraiser from signing an appraisal report on behalf of a firm, partnership, corporation or group practice.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 33.

62-39-325. Renewal of license or certificate — Rules — Legislative intent.

In accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, the commission shall promulgate rules to ensure that each individual renewing the individual's license or certificate has a working knowledge of current real estate appraisal theories, practices and techniques sufficient to enable the individual to provide competent real estate appraisal services to the members of the public with whom the individual deals in a professional relationship.

It is the intent of this chapter to meet the minimum criteria for certification established from time to time by the appraiser qualifications board of the appraisal foundation, and the commission may recommend changes to this section to meet those criteria.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 34; 1991, ch. 366, § 35.

62-39-326. Violations — Revocation or suspension.

The rights of any applicant or holder under a certificate as a state licensed or certified real estate appraiser may be revoked, suspended or restricted, or the owner of the certificate may be assessed a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation, or otherwise disciplined in accordance with this chapter, upon any of the following grounds:

Procuring or attempting to procure a license or certificate pursuant to this chapter by knowingly making a false statement, submitting false information, refusing to provide complete information in response to a question in an application for a license or certificate or through any form of fraud or misrepresentation;

Paying money other than provided for by this chapter to any member or employee of the commission to procure a license or certificate under this chapter;

Conviction, including conviction based upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, of a crime that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a person developing appraisals and communicating appraisals to others or conviction of any felony. However, an action taken under this subdivision (3) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title;

An action or omission involving dishonesty, fraud or misrepresentation; or

A violation of any of the standards for appraisals and appraisal practice as set forth in this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 35; 1991, ch. 366, § 36; 1995, ch. 222, § 4; 2018, ch. 745, § 20.

62-39-327. Notice of charges — Requirements — Subpoenas.

Before suspending or revoking any license or certification, the commission shall notify the appraiser in writing of any charges within a reasonable period of time prior to the date set for the hearing and shall afford the appraiser an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

The written notice may be served either personally or sent by registered or certified mail to the last known business address of the appraiser.

The commission shall have the power to subpoena and issue subpoenas duces tecum and to bring before it any person in this state and to take testimony by deposition, in the same manner as prescribed by law in judicial proceedings in the courts of this state.

The commission shall not consider a complaint for disciplinary action against a real estate appraiser if the complaint relates to an appraisal that was completed more than three (3) years before the complaint was submitted to the commission.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 36; 1991, ch. 366, § 37; 2017, ch. 234, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 234, § 3 provided that the act, which added (d), shall apply to actions accruing and appraisals conducted on or after July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

62-39-328. Hearing.

The hearing on the charges shall be at a time and place prescribed by the commission and in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 37; 1991, ch. 366, § 38.

62-39-329. Appraisal standards.

It is the intent of this chapter that real estate appraisals be performed in accordance with generally accepted appraisal standards; therefore, state licensed and/or certified real estate appraisers must comply with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice promulgated by the appraisal standards board of the appraisal foundation and any other duly established standards of the commission. The commission shall not establish any criteria for licensure that are more stringent than the criteria established by the federal appraiser qualification board.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 38; 1991, ch. 366, § 39.

Attorney General Opinions. Whether an “evaluation” of real property constitutes an “appraisal” and an “appraisal report”. OAG 10-25, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (3/5/10).

62-39-330. Employing or retaining an appraiser as disinterested third party or for specialized services.

A client or employer may retain or employ a state licensed or certified real estate appraiser to act as a disinterested third party in rendering an unbiased estimate of value or analysis. A client or employer may also retain or employ a state licensed or certified real estate appraiser to provide specialized services to facilitate the client's or employer's objectives. In either case, the appraisal and the appraisal report must be prepared in compliance with this chapter.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 39; 1991, ch. 366, § 40.

Cross-References. Definitions, § 62-39-102.

62-39-331. Certain contingent fees prohibited — Exception.

A state licensed or certified real estate appraiser may not accept a fee for an appraisal assignment that is contingent upon the appraiser reporting a predetermined estimate, analysis or opinion or is contingent upon the opinion, conclusion or valuation reached or upon the consequences resulting from the appraisal assignment.

A state licensed or certified real estate appraiser who enters into an agreement to perform specialized services may be paid a fixed fee or a fee that is contingent on the results achieved by the specialized services.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 40.

62-39-332. Records retention.

A state licensed or certified real estate appraiser shall retain the following records for five (5) years or for at least two (2) years after the disposition of any civil, criminal or administrative proceeding in which testimony was given about an appraisal assignment or appraisal report, whichever period expires last:

Originals and true copies of all engagement letters and written contracts engaging the appraiser's services for real property appraisal work; and

All reports and support data assembled and formulated by the appraiser in preparing the report.

The five-year period for the retention of records shall commence on the date that the appraiser submits the appraisal to the client.

All records required to be maintained under this chapter shall be made available by the state licensed or certified real estate appraiser for inspection and copying by the commission on reasonable notice to the appraiser.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 41; 2007, ch. 101, § 1.

62-39-333. Commission — Authority to promulgate rules and regulations.

The commission shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, as may be necessary to ensure compliance with the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989, and other federal law that may be applicable.

It is the intent of this chapter to enact policies, practices and procedures consistent with Title XI of the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989. Under federal law, this chapter is subject to judicial review and review by the appraisal subcommittee of the federal financial institutions examination council. If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or in any circumstance is declared by the appraisal subcommittee and a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid or unenforceable, provisions constituting the remainder of the chapter and the application of those provisions to other persons and in other circumstances shall not be affected.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 42.

Compiler's Notes. The Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989, referred to in this section, is codified primarily in 12 U.S.C. §§ 93 et seq., with parts codified in 5, 15, 18 and 26 U.S.C.

62-39-334. Court testimony — Receipt of fee.

This chapter shall not act or be construed to prohibit a real estate broker licensed under chapter 13 of this title from testifying as to the value of property in court cases as an expert witness and receiving a fee for the testimony subject to review by the court.

Acts 1990, ch. 865, § 47; T.C.A. § 62-39-335.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 62-39-335 to § 62-39-334 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

62-39-335. Minimum requirements.

It is the legislative intent that this chapter shall not require an applicant to have more than the minimum hourly requirements of education and experience in order to qualify for full licensure or certification. The minimum requirements are those requirements set forth by the appraisal foundation. The Tennessee real estate appraisal commission has the authority to adjust hourly education and experience requirements in order to meet the minimum federal standards.

Acts 1991, ch. 366, § 43; 1994, ch. 605, § 5; T.C.A. § 62-39-337.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 62-39-337 to § 62-39-335 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

62-39-336. Temporary practice permits — Administrative action — Consent to suit.

The commission may issue a temporary practice permit to a nonresident of this state who is properly licensed or certified in another state. The holder of a valid temporary practice permit shall be authorized to perform appraisals in this state subject to the requirements of this chapter and the rules promulgated by the commission.

The commission shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing temporary practice, pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, as may be necessary to ensure compliance with the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989 and other federal law that may be applicable. The commission may also adopt emergency rules as determined to be necessary to effectuate this section, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Under no circumstances, other than as stated in this chapter, shall an appraiser who is not licensed or certified in this state be authorized to perform appraisals in this state.

Every applicant for a temporary practice permit shall file with the commission, on a form approved by the commission, an irrevocable consent that legal actions may be properly commenced against the applicant in this state. The consent shall be duly notarized and, if made by a corporation, shall be authenticated by its seal.

Acts 1992, ch. 697, § 6; 2001, ch. 81, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, § 12; T.C.A. § 62-39-338.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 62-39-338 to § 62-39-336 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

Compiler's Notes. The Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989, referred to in (b), is codified primarily in 12 U.S.C. §§ 93 et seq., with parts codified in 5, 15, 18 and 26 U.S.C.